Utah statutes.
78B-6-707.   Indemnification provisions void and unenforceable.

Any clause in a sales contract or collateral document that requires a purchaser or end user of a product to indemnify, hold harmless, or defend a manufacturer of a product is contrary to public policy and void and unenforceable if a defect in the design or manufacturing of the product causes an injury or death.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

